Illinois, session 104th, HB5579.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Local 5Referendum Neutrality and Taxpayer Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Section:7    "Advocacy" means any communication or activity reasonably 8designed to influence voter support in favor of or in 9opposition to a referendum or potential referendum.10    "Election authority" means the county clerk or board of 11election commissioners having jurisdiction over the election 12in which the local referendum will appear on the ballot.13    "Local referendum" means any ballot proposition initiated 14by or on behalf of a unit of local government, school district, 15or special district that authorizes a tax increase, tax 16extension, levy, or bond issuance.17    "Neutral explanatory statement" means factual, descriptive 18information limited to the legal effect, duration, and 19standardized fiscal impact of a referendum, presented without 20advocacy, persuasive framing, value judgments, or 21exhortations. 22    Section 10. Permitted communications.  HB5579- 2 -LRB104 19468 SPS 32916 b1    (a) A public body may only expend public funds related to a 2local referendum for the following purposes:3        (1) preparation of a neutral explanatory statement 4    describing the legal effect and operation of the 5    referendum, prepared by the election authority or its 6    legal counsel;7        (2) preparation of a standardized fiscal impact 8    statement using uniform assumptions prescribed by the 9    election authority;10        (3) publication of the ballot language as certified; 11    and12        (4) distribution of the argument in favor and argument 13    in opposition submitted in accordance with subsection (c).14    (b) Any referendum-related communications not authorized 15by subsection (a) using public funds, public facilities, or 16employee compensated time are prohibited.17    (c) If one or more political committees are properly 18registered under the Election Code for or against a local 19referendum, the election authority shall designate as the 20official committee in favor and the official committee opposed 21whichever committee on each side submits the most verified 22voter endorsements from registered voters residing in the 23jurisdiction of the public body submitting the referendum. 24    Section 15. Voter endorsement requirements. A voter 25endorsement considered under subsection (c) of Section 10   HB5579- 3 -LRB104 19468 SPS 32916 b1shall be considered valid only if it:2        (1) is submitted by a natural person registered to 3    vote in the jurisdiction;4        (2) includes the voter's name and residential address; 5    and6        (3) contains the following attestation: "I am a 7    registered voter residing in this jurisdiction and I 8    designate this committee as the official author of the 9    argument in favor of [or opposition to] the proposed 10    referendum for purposes of the official voter 11    information". 12    Section 20. Limitations on endorsements and committee 13participation.14    (a) A voter may endorse only one committee in favor or one 15committee opposed to a referendum.16    (b) No person may simultaneously participate in, direct, 17or act on behalf of both a committee in favor and committee in 18opposition.19    (c) No officer, employee, contractor, or agent of the 20public body submitting the referendum may participate in, 21direct, or act on behalf of either the committee in favor or 22the committee in opposition. 23    Section 25. Endorsement collection period. The election 24authority shall establish an endorsement collection period of   HB5579- 4 -LRB104 19468 SPS 32916 b1not less than 30 days after the certification of the 2referendum question. The election authority shall only 3consider endorsements submitted during this period. 4    Section 30. Tie resolution. If 2 or more committees on the 5same side submit an equal number of verified endorsements, the 6election authority shall resolve the tie by conducting a 7public lottery. 8    Section 35. Absence of endorsements. If no committee 9submits endorsements on one side of the referendum, the 10election authority shall solicit volunteers from registered 11voters residing in the jurisdiction and select committee 12members by random draw. If no volunteers come forward, the 13voter information package shall state: "No argument was 14submitted in favor of [or in opposition to] this proposition". 15    Section 40. No exclusive speech rights; scope of 16designation. Designation or nondesignation of a committee 17under this Section shall not be construed to confer any 18exclusive right to speak, campaign, fundraise, associate, or 19otherwise advocate for or against a referendum. This Section 20only controls participation in the official voter information 21package prepared and distributed by the election authority. 22    Section 45. Personal-capacity advocacy by public   HB5579- 5 -LRB104 19468 SPS 32916 b1employees. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit an officer, 2employee, contractor, or agent of a public body from engaging 3in referendum advocacy in a personal capacity, provided that 4no public funds, public facilities, public resources, or 5employee compensated time are used for the advocacy. 6    Section 50. Prohibited conduct. No public body shall 7expend public funds, use public facilities, or use employee 8compensated time to engage in any activity reasonably designed 9to influence voter support for or opposition to a referendum 10or potential referendum, including, but not limited to:11        (1) public opinion polling or surveying of voters 12    regarding support, opposition, tax tolerance, or message 13    receptivity;14        (2) message testing, scenario testing, or framing of 15    funding levels for electoral viability;16        (3) development, production, or dissemination of 17    promotional materials highlighting benefits of passage or 18    defeat without equal presentation of opposing 19    considerations;20        (4) strategic communications planning related to a 21    referendum campaign;22        (5) social media advocacy, targeted outreach, or 23    audience segmentation related to a referendum;24        (6) press releases, presentations, speeches, websites, 25    newsletters, or public messaging advocating for passage or   HB5579- 6 -LRB104 19468 SPS 32916 b1    defeat;2        (7) engagement of consultants whose services include 3    referendum campaign strategy, voter persuasion, opposition 4    research, or campaign management;5        (8) internal planning or coordination intended to 6    transition public resources, data, or messaging to a 7    political committee advocating passage or defeat; and8        (9) organizing, facilitating, funding, or conducting 9    polling, focus groups, listening sessions, message 10    testing, or other voter research activities intended to 11    refine messaging, assess electoral viability, identify 12    supporters or opponents, shape narratives, or otherwise 13    plan, develop, or support referendum campaign strategy or 14    infrastructure. 15    Section 55. Timing requirements.16    (a) An election authority shall designate the official 17committee in favor and the official committee opposed no later 18than 80 days before the election at which the referendum will 19appear.20    (b) The official committee in favor and committee in 21opposition shall have a protected writing period of not less 22than 14 days after the final designation. The official 23argument in favor and argument in opposition shall be 24submitted to the election authority no later than the 25statutory deadline for certification of ballot questions   HB5579- 7 -LRB104 19468 SPS 32916 b1applicable to that election, as provided in this Code. No 2argument submitted after the certification deadline shall be 3accepted or published. 4    Section 60. Review and publication. The election authority 5may review the argument in favor and argument in opposition 6solely for compliance with uniform formatting requirements, 7equal word limits, and prohibitions on obscenity or libel. No 8substantive edits to advocacy arguments shall be made. All 9materials shall be certified and published as a single voter 10information package. 11    Section 65. Enforcement and official misconduct.12    (a) Any elector residing in the jurisdiction of the 13referendum may seek declaratory or injunctive relief to 14enforce this Act.15    (b) Any officer, employee, or agent of a public body who 16knowingly authorizes, directs, or participates in a violation 17of this Act commits an act in excess of lawful authority for 18the purposes of Section 33-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 19    Section 90. The State Officials and Employees Ethics Act 20is amended by adding Section 5-15.5 as follows: 21    (5 ILCS 430/5-15.5 new)22    Sec. 5-15.5. Referendum-related political activity. Public   HB5579- 8 -LRB104 19468 SPS 32916 b1opinion polling, voter surveying, message testing, strategic 2communications, or other activities intended to influence 3voter support for or opposition to a referendum or potential 4referendum, when conducted using public funds, public 5facilities, or employee compensated time, constitute 6prohibited political activity. Nothing in this Section limits 7investigation or prosecution under Section 33-3 of the 8Criminal Code of 2012 or any other applicable law. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.